lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/7.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl %> 
+Nom +Gen +Ine +Ela +Ill
%^WG %^A %^E %^V

LEXICON Root

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
ruoto 2TAVUISET ; ! t:d
silta 2TAVUISET ; ! t:l
parta 2TAVUISET ; ! t:r
auto 2TAVUISET ; ! t2:t
pöytä 2TAVUISET ; 
kunta 2TAVUISET ; 
siili 2TAVUISET ;
sukka 2TAVUISET ;
talo 2TAVUISET ;
jälki 2TAVUISET ;


LEXICON 2TAVUISET
+N+Sg+Nom: # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n # ;
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A # ;
+N+Sg+Ill:^E^V%>n # ;
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n^A # ;
